Illinois, session 104th, SB1472.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by changing 5Sections 6-15 and 6-34 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/6-15)7    Sec. 6-15. Political makeup and compensation. The board of 8review appointed under Section 6-5 shall consist of 3 members, 9of which no more than 2 members may be of whom are affiliated 10with the same political party polling the highest vote for any 11county office in the county at the last general election prior 12to any appointment made under this Section. The third member 13shall not be affiliated with that same party. Each member of 14the board of review shall receive an annual salary to be fixed 15by the county board and paid out of the county treasury.16(Source: P.A. 98-322, eff. 8-12-13.) 17    (35 ILCS 200/6-34)18    Sec. 6-34. Political makeup. If the board of county 19commissioners appoints a board of review as prescribed in 20Section 6-30, the board of review shall consist of 3 members, 21of which no more than 2 members may be affiliated with the same 22political party 2 members affiliated with the political party   SB1472- 2 -LRB104 05956 HLH 15989 b1polling the highest vote for any county office in the county 2and one member of the party polling the second highest vote for 3the same county office at the last general election.4(Source: P.A. 90-552, eff. 1-1-99.) 5    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 6becoming law.